Hawaii, session 2026, SB1566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State's public schools have been facing severe teacher shortages for years with little support to address this issue.  The department of education, along with the Hawaii teacher standards board as sponsor, seeks to create and bolster the state teacher apprenticeship program through mentor training, creating mentor apprenticeship curriculum, monitoring, and providing coordination for the creation of multiple pathways for apprentices to become teachers. The legislature further finds that the lack of apprenticeship programs to assist future teachers in obtaining the necessary licenses and gaining workforce experience contributes to poor retention, lack of diversity, and lack of more recruitment in local communities for individuals to become teachers in state public schools.  Hawaii needs a structured teacher registered apprenticeship program to boost retention, diversity, and recruitment among the State's teachers in public schools.  The department of education will need positions to manage, create, and evaluate metrics for federal and state reporting requirements of such a teacher registered apprenticeship program. The purpose of this Act is to establish and appropriate funds for a teacher registered apprenticeship program to support, recruit, develop, and retain teachers for Hawaii's public schools. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part III, subpart D, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Hawaii teacher registered apprenticeship program. (a)  The board shall develop and implement a Hawaii teacher registered apprenticeship program, the purpose of which shall be to recruit, retain, and increase the number of teachers throughout the State. (b)  The board shall work with the department of labor and industrial relations to develop the program.  The board may work with board-approved institutions of higher education that are authorized Hawaii post-secondary education programs with a physical presence in the State and other education stakeholders approved by the board for the purposes of the Hawaii teacher registered apprenticeship program. (c)  An individual may apply for participation in the Hawaii teacher registered apprenticeship program if the individual: (1)  Is currently employed as an educational assistant or teacher assistant at a public school or public charter school in the State; or (2)  Is newly hired to begin working as an educational assistant or teacher assistant at a public school or public charter school in the State for which the individual is applying for participation in the program. (d)  The board, in compliance with department of labor and industrial relations and federal teacher registered apprenticeship regulations, shall determine the requirements for acceptance and completion of the Hawaii teacher registered apprenticeship program. (e)  The board shall issue a teaching license to an applicant who successfully completes all of the Hawaii teacher registered apprenticeship program requirements and meets all other teaching licensing requirements. (f)  The board shall determine mentor qualifications and requirements in compliance with federal Department of Labor regulations, including mentor professional development, length of time apprentices are required to be in their classrooms, and meetings to update the educational providers and the board with assistance apprentices may need.  Mentors shall receive a stipend of $4,000 when requirements established pursuant to this subsection are met." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $426,848 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to establish the Hawaii teacher registered apprenticeship program pursuant to section 302A-   , Hawaii Revised Statutes; provided that the funds appropriated shall be used as follows: (1)  $200,000 for stipends for mentors in the program; (2)  $116,712 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) business manager officer II position; and (3)  $110,136 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) institutional analyst II position. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________